Massachusetts, session 194th, S1361.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 30 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 46I, the
following new section:-
Section 46J. Prenatal Leave
(A) Employers are required to give employees twenty-four hours of paid prenatal leave
during a fifty-two-week calendar. This leave can be taken and will be paid in hourly increments.
This compensation will be paid to employees at the rate of the regularly hour wage or the
minimum wage whichever is bigger. An employer will not be required to pay an employee in
cases where there is leftover prenatal leave due to that employee's separation from the company
in the form of but not limited to termination, retirement, resignation or any other form of
separation.
of 2

(B) Paid prenatal leave is defined as leave taken for health care services related or during
an individual's pregnancy such as but not limited to monitoring through ultrasounds, testing, or
appointments regarding either the baby or the mother's health.
(C) An employer may not require the disclosure of confidential information relating to
paid personal leave. No employer or their agent, or the officer or agent of any corporation,
partnership, or limited liability company, or any other
person, shall discharge, threaten, penalize, or in any other manner discriminate or
retaliate against any employee because such employee has exercised their rights afforded under
this section, including, but not
limited to, requesting sick leave or paid prenatal leave and using sick leave or paid
prenatal leave, consistent with the provisions of this section.
(D) Employers are required to give employees ten hours of prenatal leave for partner
support.
of 2